Utah statutes.
53-8-209.   Inspection by officers -- Certificate of inspection.
(1)  A peace officer may stop, inspect, and test a vehicle at any time upon
reasonable cause to believe that:
(a)  a vehicle is unsafe or not equipped as required by law; or
(b)  that its equipment is not in proper adjustment or repair.
(2) (a) (i)  If a vehicle is found to be in unsafe condition or any required
part or equipment is not present or is not in proper repair and adjustment,
the officer shall give a written notice to the driver and shall send a copy to
the division.
(ii)  The notice shall:
(A)  require that the vehicle be placed in safe condition and its equipment in
proper repair and adjustment;
(B)  specify the repairs and adjustments needed; and
(C)  require that a safety inspection certificate be obtained within five
days.
(b)  If a vehicle is, in the reasonable judgment of the peace officer,
hazardous to operate, the peace officer may require that the vehicle:
(i)  not be operated under its own power; or
(ii)  be driven to the nearest garage or other place of safety.
(c)  If the owner or driver does not comply with the notice requirements and
secure a safety inspection certificate  within five days, the vehicle may not
be operated on the highways of this state.
